North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143C. State Budget Act.
Article 10. Penalties.

§ 143C-10-1.
Offenses for violation of Chapter.

Class 1 misdemeanor. — It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for a person to knowingly and willfully do any one or more of the following:

Withdraw funds from the State treasury for any purpose not authorized by an act of appropriation.

Approve any fraudulent, erroneous, or otherwise invalid claim or bill to be paid from an appropriation.

Make a written statement, give a certificate, issue a report, or utter a document required by this Chapter, any portion of which is false.

Fail or refuse to perform a duty imposed by this Chapter.

Class A1 misdemeanor. — It is a Class A1 misdemeanor for a person to make a false statement in violation of

G.S. 143C-6-23(c)

.

Forfeiture of Office or Employment. — An appointed officer or employee of the State or an officer or employee of a political subdivision of the State, whether elected or appointed, forfeits his office or employment upon conviction of an offense under this section. An elected officer of the State is subject to impeachment for committing any of the offenses specified in this section.

History.

2006-203, s. 3.

§ 143C-10-2.
Civil liability for violation of Chapter.

A person convicted of an offense under

G.S. 143C-10-1

is liable in a civil action for any damages suffered by the State in consequence of the offense.

History.

2006-203, s. 3.

§ 143C-10-3.
Suspension from office or impeachment for refusal to comply with Chapter.

State Officers or Employees of the Executive Branch. — The Governor may suspend from the performance of his or her duties any State officer or employee of the executive branch except an officer elected by the people, who persists, after notice and warning, in failing or refusing to comply with the provisions of this Chapter or any lawful administrative directive issued pursuant to this Chapter. Before acting to suspend, the Governor shall give the accused notice and an opportunity to be heard in his or her own defense. The Governor shall report the facts leading to suspension to the Attorney General who may initiate appropriate criminal or civil proceedings. The Governor may apply to the General Court of Justice for a restraining order and injunction if a suspended officer or employee persists in performing official acts.

Elected Officers. — A State officer elected by the people who knowingly and willfully fails or refuses to comply with any provision of this Chapter or any lawful administrative directive issued under this Chapter is subject to impeachment.

History.

2006-203, s. 3; 2007-393, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-393, s. 10, effective October 1, 2007, in subsection (a), substituted “Officers or Employees of the Executive Branch” for “Officer or Employee” in the subsection heading and substituted “employee of the executive branch” for “employee,” in the first sentence.